Maryland, session 2025, HB1374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1374*

HOUSE BILL 1374
Article – Education
7–1A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Cost of quality” means the per–pupil amount provided under § 5–229 of this
article.
(c) “Early childhood educator career ladder” means the career ladder for private
provider prekindergarten educators established by the Department under § 7–1A–08 of this
subtitle.
(d) “Eligible prekindergarten provider” includes an:
(1) Eligible public provider; and
(2) Eligible private provider.
(e) (1) “Eligible private provider” means a community–based early learning
program that:
(i) Is licensed in the State;
(ii) Does not charge more tuition for full–day prekindergarten than
the cost of quality; and
(iii) Meets the requirements under § 7–1A–04 of this subtitle.
(2) “Eligible private provider” includes the Ulysses Currie Head Start
Program under § 5–231 of this article.
(f) “Eligible public provider” means an early learning program that:
(1) Is provided by a county board at a public school; and
(2) Meets the requirements under § 7–1A–04 of this subtitle.
(g) “Full–day prekindergarten” means an early learning program with a six and
one–half hour school day.
(h) “Prekindergarten program” means an early learning program at an eligible
prekindergarten provider.

HOUSE BILL 1374 3
(i) “Prekindergarten provider hub” means a coordinated partnership between
eligible prekindergarten providers and other entities established by the Department under
§ 7–1A–09 of this subtitle.
(j) “Prekindergarten slot” means the available space for a child to attend a
prekindergarten program.
(k) “Tier I child” means a child:
(1) (I) Who is [3 or] 4 years old;
[(2) (i)] (II) 1. Whose family income is less than or equal to 300%
of the federal poverty level; or
[(ii)] 2. Who is a homeless youth; and
[(3)] (III) Whose family chooses to enroll the child in full–day
prekindergarten; OR
(2) (I) WHO IS 3 YEARS OLD;
(II) WHO RESIDES IN A COUNTY IN WHICH AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE
PROVIDER ELECTS TO ENROLL 3–YEAR–OLDS IN ITS PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM
UNDER § 7–1A–04.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) 1. WHOSE FAMILY INCOME IS LESS THAN OR EQUAL TO
300% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL; OR
2. WHO IS A HOMELESS YOUTH; AND
(IV) WHOSE FAMILY CHOOSES TO ENROLL THE CHILD IN
FULL–DAY PREKINDERGARTEN WITH AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER.
(l) “Tier II child” means a child:
(1) Who is 4 years old;
(2) (i) In fiscal year 2026, whose family income is more than 300% but
not more than 360% of the federal poverty level; and
(ii) In fiscal year 2027 and in each fiscal year thereafter, whose
family income is more than 300% but not more than 600% of the federal poverty level; and
(3) Whose family chooses to enroll the child in full–day prekindergarten.

HOUSE BILL 1374
(m) “Tier III child” means a child:
(1) Who is 4 years old;
(2) Whose family income is more than 600% of the federal poverty level;
and
(3) Whose family chooses to enroll the child in full–day prekindergarten.
7–1A–02.
(a) (1) A local department of social services or a local health department shall
provide a parent or guardian with oral and written notice that their child may be eligible
for publicly funded prekindergarten programs if the parent or guardian:
(i) Applied for economic services with the local department of social
services or the local health department; and
(ii) 1. Has a child who will be [3 or] 4 years old by September 1
of the next academic year; OR
2. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
HAS A CHILD WHO WILL BE 3 YEARS OLD BY SEPTEMBER 1 OF THE NEXT ACADEMIC
YEAR.
(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
include:
(i) Contact information for the enrollment office of the local school
system and the Division of Early Childhood Development in the Department; and
(ii) Information on the existence of the child care scholarship for
before and after full–day prekindergarten programming and the possibility of eligibility for
State aid.
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT HAS NOTIFIED THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES OR LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT THAT ELIGIBLE PRIVATE
PROVIDERS IN THE COUNTY HAVE ELECTED TO ENROLL TIER I 3–YEAR–OLDS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–1A–04.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES OR A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO
THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD WHO WILL BE 3 YEARS OLD BY SEPTEMBER
1 OF THE NEXT ACADEMIC YEAR IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
[(3)] (4) On or before December 1 of each year, each local department of
social services and each local health department shall report to the General Assembly, in

HOUSE BILL 1374 5
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the number of parents who
were given a notification and subsequently enrolled their child in a publicly funded
prekindergarten program.
(b) Each local department of social services or a local health department shall
provide to each local school system the name and contact information for each parent or
guardian provided notice under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The requirements set forth in § 7–101(b) of this title regarding the domicile of
a child and the residency of the child’s parent or guardian shall apply to prekindergarten
programs established by county boards as required by this subtitle.
7–1A–03.
(a) (1) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a county board
shall ensure that:
[(1)] (I) Beginning in the 2024–2025 school year, prekindergarten slots
provided by eligible private providers shall account for at least 10% of the total
prekindergarten slots provided by eligible prekindergarten providers in each county;
[(2)] (II) The proportion of eligible private provider prekindergarten slots
in each county increases by 10 percentage points every school year, until, in the 2028–2029
school year, eligible private provider prekindergarten slots account for at least 50% of
eligible prekindergarten provider prekindergarten slots in each county; and
[(3)] (III) In each year after the 2028–2029 school year, the proportion of
eligible private provider prekindergarten slots in each county shall continue to constitute
at least 50% of eligible prekindergarten provider prekindergarten slots in each county.
(2) A TIER I 3–YEAR–OLD ENROLLED WITH AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE
PROVIDER UNDER § 7–1A–04.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL COUNT TOWARD THE
NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER PREKINDERGARTEN SLOTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(b) (1) The Department shall issue a waiver from the requirements of this
section to a county board if:
(i) 1. All families in the county who desire to enroll their eligible
children with eligible prekindergarten providers are able to do so; or
2. After reasonable cross–jurisdictional or regional efforts,
there are too few eligible private providers to meet the minimum requirements of this
section; and

HOUSE BILL 1374
(ii) The county board demonstrates to the Department that it has
made a good faith effort to fully embrace the mixed delivery system, including by adopting
a memorandum of understanding in accordance with § 7–1A–05 of this subtitle.
(2) The Department may exclude by annual waiver Tier I children who are
3 years old in a county from the calculation under subsection (a) of this section until the
2031–2032 school year.
(3) The Department may exclude by annual waiver Tier I children who are
4 years old in a county from the calculation under subsection (a) of this section until the
2028–2029 school year.
(4) The Department shall establish waiver application procedures to carry
out the provisions of this subsection.
7–1A–04.1.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN ELIGIBLE
PRIVATE PROVIDER MAY ELECT TO ENROLL A TIER I CHILD WHO IS 3 YEARS OLD.
(2) AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER WHO ELECTS TO ENROLL A TIER
I CHILD WHO IS 3 YEARS OLD SHALL RECEIVE PUBLIC FUNDING IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 5–229 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR THAT CHILD.
(B) (1) AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER THAT ELECTS TO ENROLL TIER
I 3–YEAR–OLDS SHALL:
(I) MEET ALL THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–1A–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT SPECIFICALLY GOVERNS
THE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE PRIVATE PROVIDER, THE
DEPARTMENT, AND THE COUNTY BOARD TOWARD THE ENROLLED TIER I
3–YEAR–OLDS.
(2) AT A MINIMUM, THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING SHALL:
(I) GOVERN THE DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS BY THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE COUNTY BOARD IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER FUNDING
DISTRIBUTED TO ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–229 OF
THIS ARTICLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1374 7
(II) REQUIRE THE ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER TO PROMPTLY
NOTIFY AND CONTINUALLY UPDATE THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COUNTY BOARD
ON:
1. THE NUMBER OF PREKINDERGARTEN SLOTS THE
PRIVATE PROVIDER IS USING TO ENROLL TIER I 3–YEAR–OLDS; AND
2. THE TIME PERIOD DURING WHICH A TIER I
3–YEAR–OLD IS USING THOSE PREKINDERGARTEN SLOTS.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES AND A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH IF ELIGIBLE PRIVATE
PROVIDERS IN THE COUNTY HAVE ELECTED TO ENROLL TIER I 3–YEAR–OLDS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION TO ASSIST IN PROVIDING THE NOTICE REQUIRED
UNDER § 7–1A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT’S NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON
THE ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER AND THE NUMBER OF AND DURATION OF
PREKINDERGARTEN SLOTS FOR 3–YEAR–OLDS AVAILABLE.
7–1A–05.
(a) (1) Each county board shall enter into a memorandum of understanding
with the Department, each eligible private provider participating in publicly funded
prekindergarten in the county, and other applicable government agencies.
(2) Before executing a memorandum of understanding under this section,
each county board shall submit an implementation plan of the proposed memorandum of
understanding to the Accountability and Implementation Board in accordance with §
5–404 of this article.
(b) The Department shall develop a model memorandum of understanding for use
by county boards of education in fulfilling the requirements under this section.
(c) Each memorandum of understanding shall, at a minimum, provide for:
(1) The adoption of an early childhood educator career ladder by eligible
private providers in accordance with § 7–1A–08 of this subtitle;
(2) Services for children with disabilities;
(3) A process by which a parent is able to indicate a preference for eligible
prekindergarten providers;

HOUSE BILL 1374
(4) The manner for processing the payment of the State share, local share,
and family share for each child who is enrolled with an eligible prekindergarten provider;
(5) Any agreed upon administrative costs to be retained by an agency that
is party to the agreement;
(6) The manner in which the parties will meet the requirements of this
subtitle;
(7) A plan to address racial and socioeconomic integration in
prekindergarten classrooms;
(8) A method for the county board to distribute a list of eligible public and
private providers in the same area with a parent interested in enrolling the parent’s child
in a prekindergarten program;
(9) Facilitation of peer–to–peer eligible prekindergarten provider
meetings, through a prekindergarten provider hub if one is established in the area, in which
eligible prekindergarten providers are able to share best practices in the field; [and]
(10) IF THERE IS AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER THAT ELECTS TO
ENROLL TIER I 3–YEAR–OLDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–1A–04.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE
IN THE COUNTY, A PLAN TO EFFICIENTLY ENROLL 3–YEAR–OLDS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND
[(10)] (11) Any other provisions necessary to carry out this subtitle.
(d) A memorandum of understanding under this section shall seek to avoid, to the
extent practicable, a disproportionate concentration of students of the same race, ethnicity,
disability status, and income within an eligible provider.
7–1A–06.
(a) (1) Beginning in the 2022–2023 school year, Tier I children who are [3 or]
4 years old may be enrolled in a full–day prekindergarten program under this subtitle.
(2) (i) For the 2023–2024 through 2025–2026 school years, children
who are [3 or] 4 years old may enroll in a full–day prekindergarten program under this
subtitle if the children are:
1. Children whose family income is more than 300% but not
more than 600% of the federal poverty level; and
2. A. Children with disabilities; or

HOUSE BILL 1374 9
B. Children from homes in which English is not the primary
spoken language.
(ii) For the 2023–2024 through 2025–2026 school years only,
children described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be counted as Tier I
children for purposes of funding allocated under § 5–229 of this article.
(3) BEGINNING IN THE 2025–2026 SCHOOL YEAR, TIER I CHILDREN
WHO ARE 3 YEARS OLD MAY BE ENROLLED IN A FULL–DAY PREKINDERGARTEN
PROGRAM WITH AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE PROVIDER IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–1A–04.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) [(1) The proportion of enrolled Tier I children who are 3 years old shall
increase annually until all Tier I children who are 3 years old are enrolled in a full–day
prekindergarten program.
(2)] The proportion of enrolled Tier I children who are 4 years old shall
increase annually so that all Tier I children who are 4 years old shall be enrolled in a
full–day prekindergarten program.
(c) Beginning in the 2025–2026 school year, Tier II children not described under
subsection (a)(2)(i) of this section may be enrolled in a full–day prekindergarten program if
space is available to encourage socioeconomic diversity in prekindergarten classrooms.
(d) Priority in expanding prekindergarten slots shall be provided to [3– and
4–year olds] 4–YEAR–OLDS who are:
(1) Tier I children;
(2) Children with disabilities, regardless of income; or
(3) Children from homes in which English is not the primary spoken
language.
(e) The ability of a family to choose the prekindergarten provider in which to
enroll their child does not supersede local authority to set school attendance boundaries.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on a child
who is 3 years old and is enrolled in publicly provided prekindergarten with an eligible
public provider or is scheduled, on or before June 30, 2025, to be enrolled in publicly
provided prekindergarten with an eligible public provider for the 2025–2026 school year.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.